src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : Athrú +anna (io->ea)
!! eg. an cith -> na ceathanna
LEXICON Nm3-4

Nm3a-SINGULAR;
!! ^Lea,broadening, is required, in gen sg: cith -> ceatha, greim -> greama
!! and this is done using ^Ath (change)
!! pl also broadened cith -> ceathanna
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath^Lea       PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath^Lea    PL-(E)ANNA; 
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath^Lea       PL-(E)ANNA;     

LEXICON Nm3-5

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-(E)ACHA;

LEXICON Nm3-6

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-(LEA)A;

LEXICON Nm3-7

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-TA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-TA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-TA;

LEXICON Nm3-8

Nm3a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C       PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak:^G  PL-TADA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V       PL-(LEA)A;

LEXICON Nm3-8a
! sliocht - sleachta gs & pl
Nm3a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath       PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak:^G^Ath      PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath       PL-(LEA)A;


!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : +í

!! (A) nouns ending in -ín (a diminutive)
!! smidiríní (smithereens) no singular
!! eg. an cailín -> na cailíní (girls)
!! eg. an báidín -> na báidíní (small boats)

!! (B) nouns ending in -a
!! eg. an balla -> na ballaí (walls)


LEXICON Nm4-SINGULAR

+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D4;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nm4-1

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-Í;


LEXICON Nm4-2

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath           PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath    PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath           PL-Í;


LEXICON Nm4-3

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath           PL-TE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath    PL-TE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath           PL-TE;

LEXICON Nm4-4

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath           PL-THE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath    PL-THE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath           PL-THE;

LEXICON Nm4-5

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-(E)ACHA;

LEXICON Nm4-6

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-NNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-NNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-NNA;

LEXICON Nm4-7

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-(E)ANNA;

LEXICON Nm4-8

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-ITE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-ITE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-ITE;

LEXICON Nm4-9

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-ONNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-ONNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-ONNA;

LEXICON Nm4-10

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C       PL-OCHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-OCHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V       PL-OCHA;

LEXICON Nm4-11

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C       PL-(LEA)THA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-(LEA)THA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V       PL-(LEA)THA;

! 01/04/08
LEXICON Nm4-12

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C       PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V       PL-AÍ;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : +idí
! SINGULAR  ALSO IN NUM-LEX.TXT
!! an fiche -> na fichidí (the twenties) eidí needs correcting
!! an caoga -> na caogaidí (the fifties)
LEXICON Nm5-1
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D5-4;
!+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V    Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Masc+Com:^C           PL-IDÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G    PL-IDÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V           PL-IDÍ;


LEXICON Nm5-2
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D5-5;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Coim          PL-(CAOL)EACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim   PL-(CAOL)EACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Coim          PL-(CAOL)EACHA;

LEXICON Nm5-3
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D5-6;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath           PL-THE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath    PL-THE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath           PL-THE;

! GS +the
LEXICON Nm5-4
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D5-7;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V Voc-sg-0;

!PL?????????

! GS +te
LEXICON Nm5-5-SINGULAR
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D5-8;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nm5-5               ! PL +TÍ 
Nm5-5-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Atht          PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Atht       PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Atht          PL-Í;


! GS +tha
! PL +thaí
! bascadh - basctha - bascthaí
LEXICON Nm5-6
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D5-9;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V Voc-sg-0;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Aththa        PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Aththa     PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Aththa        PL-Í;

!PL?????????

! GS +ta
LEXICON Nm5-7-SINGULAR
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D5-10;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nm5-7
Nm5-7-SINGULAR;

! moladh / gs = molta / pl = moltaí
LEXICON Nm5-7a
Nm5-7-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Atht          PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Atht       PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Atht          PL-AÍ;

!----------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON Ns
+Subst+Noun+Sg:0    SéUrú;

LEXICON Nspl
+Subst+Noun+Pl:0    SéUrú;

!************************************************************************** 
!! INITIAL MUTATIONS
!************************************************************************** 
!-------------------
!! NOMINATIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------
LEXICON Nom-sg-initial
SéUrú;      
+DefArt:^Sé^tv^ts   #;  !! definite article eg. an cat (m) (p38 NIG)
            !! an t-éan(m) - the bird (p39 NIG) 
            !! an bhróg(f) - the shoe
            !! initial mutation for other reasons
            !! e.g. comp. preps. ar an gcnoc, poss. mo chat

!! ^IM = initial mutation e.g. with prepositions, and possession
!! Singular:
!! e.g. ar an bhosca, ar an mbosca
!! possessive markers on vowels: ár n-athair, a (f) hathair, 
!! Plural:
!! e.g. ar bhoscaí, i mboscaí
!! possessive e.g. ár n-aithreacha - our fathers (^C)

LEXICON SéUrú
#;          !! indefinite => no initial mutation
Emphasis;
!! appending the +Len & +Ecl rather than creating seperate forms ...
+Ecl:^IM^Urú    Emphasis;       
+Len:^IM^Sé Emphasis;       
+hPref:^IM^hv   Emphasis;   !! adds ^h to vowel-initial words ...  but adds the +hPref to all words ... see fix file
!+Poss:^Poss    Emphasis; !! +Poss tag gets appended to all nouns not
                  !! just vowel-initial e.g. doras, fiú etc.
                  !!  although no initial mutation takes place 
                    

LEXICON Emphasis
#;
+Emph:s^Emph    #;              !  NEEDS 1PL NE/NA & 3PL SEAN/SAN ALSO



!-------------------
!! GENITIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------
